District of Columbia statutes.
42-1004

Beneficial power.

A general or special power is beneficial where no person other than the grantee has, by the terms of its creation, any interest in its execution.

History

Mar. 3, 1901, 31 Stat. 1353, ch. 854, § 1040

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 45-104.
1973 Ed., § 45-1004.